Illinois, session 104th, HB5451.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5)7    Sec. 5-5. Medical services. The Illinois Department, by 8rule, shall determine the quantity and quality of and the rate 9of reimbursement for the medical assistance for which payment 10will be authorized, and the medical services to be provided, 11which may include all or part of the following: (1) inpatient 12hospital services; (2) outpatient hospital services; (3) other 13laboratory and X-ray services; (4) skilled nursing home 14services; (5) physicians' services whether furnished in the 15office, the patient's home, a hospital, a skilled nursing 16home, or elsewhere; (6) medical care, or any other type of 17remedial care furnished by licensed practitioners; (7) home 18health care services; (8) private duty nursing service; (9) 19clinic services; (10) dental services, including prevention 20and treatment of periodontal disease and dental caries disease 21for pregnant individuals, provided by an individual licensed 22to practice dentistry or dental surgery; for purposes of this 23item (10), "dental services" means diagnostic, preventive, or   HB5451- 2 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1corrective procedures provided by or under the supervision of 2a dentist in the practice of his or her profession; (11) 3physical therapy and related services; (12) prescribed drugs, 4dentures, and prosthetic devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by 5a physician skilled in the diseases of the eye, or by an 6optometrist, whichever the person may select; (13) other 7diagnostic, screening, preventive, and rehabilitative 8services, including to ensure that the individual's need for 9intervention or treatment of mental disorders or substance use 10disorders or co-occurring mental health and substance use 11disorders is determined using a uniform screening, assessment, 12and evaluation process inclusive of criteria, for children and 13adults; for purposes of this item (13), a uniform screening, 14assessment, and evaluation process refers to a process that 15includes an appropriate evaluation and, as warranted, a 16referral; "uniform" does not mean the use of a singular 17instrument, tool, or process that all must utilize; (14) 18transportation and such other expenses as may be necessary; 19(15) medical treatment of sexual assault survivors, as defined 20in Section 1a of the Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 21Treatment Act, for injuries sustained as a result of the 22sexual assault, including examinations and laboratory tests to 23discover evidence which may be used in criminal proceedings 24arising from the sexual assault; (16) the diagnosis and 25treatment of sickle cell anemia; (16.5) services performed by 26a chiropractic physician licensed under the Medical Practice   HB5451- 3 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1Act of 1987 and acting within the scope of his or her license, 2including, but not limited to, chiropractic manipulative 3treatment; and (17) any other medical care, and any other type 4of remedial care recognized under the laws of this State. The 5term "any other type of remedial care" shall include nursing 6care and nursing home service for persons who rely on 7treatment by spiritual means alone through prayer for healing. 8    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a 9comprehensive tobacco use cessation program that includes 10purchasing prescription drugs or prescription medical devices 11approved by the Food and Drug Administration shall be covered 12under the medical assistance program under this Article for 13persons who are otherwise eligible for assistance under this 14Article. 15    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 16reproductive health care that is otherwise legal in Illinois 17shall be covered under the medical assistance program for 18persons who are otherwise eligible for medical assistance 19under this Article. 20    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, all 21tobacco cessation medications approved by the United States 22Food and Drug Administration and all individual and group 23tobacco cessation counseling services and telephone-based 24counseling services and tobacco cessation medications provided 25through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline shall be covered under 26the medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise   HB5451- 4 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1eligible for assistance under this Article. The Department 2shall comply with all federal requirements necessary to obtain 3federal financial participation, as specified in 42 CFR 4433.15(b)(7), for telephone-based counseling services provided 5through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline, including, but not 6limited to: (i) entering into a memorandum of understanding or 7interagency agreement with the Department of Public Health, as 8administrator of the Illinois Tobacco Quitline; and (ii) 9developing a cost allocation plan for Medicaid-allowable 10Illinois Tobacco Quitline services in accordance with 45 CFR 1195.507. The Department shall submit the memorandum of 12understanding or interagency agreement, the cost allocation 13plan, and all other necessary documentation to the Centers for 14Medicare and Medicaid Services for review and approval. 15Coverage under this paragraph shall be contingent upon federal 16approval.17    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 18Illinois Department may not require, as a condition of payment 19for any laboratory test authorized under this Article, that a 20physician's handwritten signature appear on the laboratory 21test order form. The Illinois Department may, however, impose 22other appropriate requirements regarding laboratory test order 23documentation. 24    Upon receipt of federal approval of an amendment to the 25Illinois Title XIX State Plan for this purpose, the Department 26shall authorize the Chicago Public Schools (CPS) to procure a   HB5451- 5 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1vendor or vendors to manufacture eyeglasses for individuals 2enrolled in a school within the CPS system. CPS shall ensure 3that its vendor or vendors are enrolled as providers in the 4medical assistance program and in any capitated Medicaid 5managed care entity (MCE) serving individuals enrolled in a 6school within the CPS system. Under any contract procured 7under this provision, the vendor or vendors must serve only 8individuals enrolled in a school within the CPS system. Claims 9for services provided by CPS's vendor or vendors to recipients 10of benefits in the medical assistance program under this Code, 11the Children's Health Insurance Program, or the Covering ALL 12KIDS Health Insurance Program shall be submitted to the 13Department or the MCE in which the individual is enrolled for 14payment and shall be reimbursed at the Department's or the 15MCE's established rates or rate methodologies for eyeglasses. 16    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department of Healthcare 17and Family Services may provide the following services to 18persons eligible for assistance under this Article who are 19participating in education, training or employment programs 20operated by the Department of Human Services as successor to 21the Department of Public Aid:22        (1) dental services provided by or under the 23    supervision of a dentist; and 24        (2) eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in 25    the diseases of the eye, or by an optometrist, whichever 26    the person may select.  HB5451- 6 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1    On and after July 1, 2018, the Department of Healthcare 2and Family Services shall provide dental services to any adult 3who is otherwise eligible for assistance under the medical 4assistance program. As used in this paragraph, "dental 5services" means diagnostic, preventative, restorative, or 6corrective procedures, including procedures and services for 7the prevention and treatment of periodontal disease and dental 8caries disease, provided by an individual who is licensed to 9practice dentistry or dental surgery or who is under the 10supervision of a dentist in the practice of his or her 11profession.12    On and after July 1, 2018, targeted dental services, as 13set forth in Exhibit D of the Consent Decree entered by the 14United States District Court for the Northern District of 15Illinois, Eastern Division, in the matter of Memisovski v. 16Maram, Case No. 92 C 1982, that are provided to adults under 17the medical assistance program shall be established at no less 18than the rates set forth in the "New Rate" column in Exhibit D 19of the Consent Decree for targeted dental services that are 20provided to persons under the age of 18 under the medical 21assistance program. 22    Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2025, 23the rates paid for sedation evaluation and the provision of 24deep sedation and intravenous sedation for the purpose of 25dental services shall be increased by 33% above the rates in 26effect on December 31, 2024. The rates paid for nitrous oxide   HB5451- 7 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1sedation shall not be impacted by this paragraph and shall 2remain the same as the rates in effect on December 31, 2024. 3    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code and 4subject to federal approval, the Department may adopt rules to 5allow a dentist who is volunteering his or her service at no 6cost to render dental services through an enrolled 7not-for-profit health clinic without the dentist personally 8enrolling as a participating provider in the medical 9assistance program. A not-for-profit health clinic shall 10include a public health clinic or Federally Qualified Health 11Center or other enrolled provider, as determined by the 12Department, through which dental services covered under this 13Section are performed. The Department shall establish a 14process for payment of claims for reimbursement for covered 15dental services rendered under this provision. 16    Subject to appropriation and to federal approval, the 17Department shall file administrative rules updating the 18Handicapping Labio-Lingual Deviation orthodontic scoring tool 19by January 1, 2025, or as soon as practicable. 20    On and after January 1, 2022, the Department of Healthcare 21and Family Services shall administer and regulate a 22school-based dental program that allows for the out-of-office 23delivery of preventative dental services in a school setting 24to children under 19 years of age. The Department shall 25establish, by rule, guidelines for participation by providers 26and set requirements for follow-up referral care based on the   HB5451- 8 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1requirements established in the Dental Office Reference Manual 2published by the Department that establishes the requirements 3for dentists participating in the All Kids Dental School 4Program. Every effort shall be made by the Department when 5developing the program requirements to consider the different 6geographic differences of both urban and rural areas of the 7State for initial treatment and necessary follow-up care. No 8provider shall be charged a fee by any unit of local government 9to participate in the school-based dental program administered 10by the Department. Nothing in this paragraph shall be 11construed to limit or preempt a home rule unit's or school 12district's authority to establish, change, or administer a 13school-based dental program in addition to, or independent of, 14the school-based dental program administered by the 15Department. 16    The Illinois Department, by rule, may distinguish and 17classify the medical services to be provided only in 18accordance with the classes of persons designated in Section 195-2. 20    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services must 21provide coverage and reimbursement for amino acid-based 22elemental formulas, regardless of delivery method, for the 23diagnosis and treatment of (i) eosinophilic disorders and (ii) 24short bowel syndrome when the prescribing physician has issued 25a written order stating that the amino acid-based elemental 26formula is medically necessary.   HB5451- 9 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1    The Illinois Department shall authorize the provision of, 2and shall authorize payment for, screening by low-dose 3mammography for the presence of occult breast cancer for 4individuals 25 35 years of age or older who are eligible for 5medical assistance under this Article, as follows:6        (A) A baseline mammogram for individuals 25 35 to 39 7    years of age. 8        (B) An annual mammogram for individuals 40 years of 9    age or older with no family history.10        (C) A mammogram at the age and intervals considered 11    medically necessary by the individual's health care 12    provider for individuals under 40 years of age, based on 13    physician recommendation for familial risk, and having a 14    family history of breast cancer, prior personal history of 15    breast cancer, positive genetic testing, or other risk 16    factors.17        (D) A comprehensive ultrasound screening and MRI of an 18    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 19    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 20    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 21    practice medicine in all of its branches. 22        (E) A screening MRI when medically necessary, as 23    determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine in 24    all of its branches. 25        (F) A diagnostic mammogram when medically necessary, 26    as determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine   HB5451- 10 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1    in all its branches, advanced practice registered nurse, 2    or physician assistant. 3        (G) Molecular breast imaging (MBI) and MRI of an 4    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 5    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 6    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 7    practice medicine in all of its branches, advanced 8    practice registered nurse, or physician assistant. 9    The Department shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, 10copayment, or any other cost-sharing requirement on the 11coverage provided under this paragraph; except that this 12sentence does not apply to coverage of diagnostic mammograms 13to the extent such coverage would disqualify a high-deductible 14health plan from eligibility for a health savings account 15pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 16U.S.C. 223). 17    All screenings shall include a physical breast exam, 18instruction on self-examination and information regarding the 19frequency of self-examination and its value as a preventative 20tool.21    For purposes of this Section:22    "Diagnostic mammogram" means a mammogram obtained using 23diagnostic mammography.24    "Diagnostic mammography" means a method of screening that 25is designed to evaluate an abnormality in a breast, including 26an abnormality seen or suspected on a screening mammogram or a   HB5451- 11 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1subjective or objective abnormality otherwise detected in the 2breast.3    "Low-dose mammography" means the x-ray examination of the 4breast using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 5including the x-ray tube, filter, compression device, and 6image receptor, with an average radiation exposure delivery of 7less than one rad per breast for 2 views of an average size 8breast. The term also includes digital mammography and 9includes breast tomosynthesis.10    "Breast tomosynthesis" means a radiologic procedure that 11involves the acquisition of projection images over the 12stationary breast to produce cross-sectional digital 13three-dimensional images of the breast.14    If, at any time, the Secretary of the United States 15Department of Health and Human Services, or its successor 16agency, promulgates rules or regulations to be published in 17the Federal Register or publishes a comment in the Federal 18Register or issues an opinion, guidance, or other action that 19would require the State, pursuant to any provision of the 20Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 21111-148), including, but not limited to, 42 U.S.C. 2218031(d)(3)(B) or any successor provision, to defray the cost 23of any coverage for breast tomosynthesis outlined in this 24paragraph, then the requirement that an insurer cover breast 25tomosynthesis is inoperative other than any such coverage 26authorized under Section 1902 of the Social Security Act, 42   HB5451- 12 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1U.S.C. 1396a, and the State shall not assume any obligation 2for the cost of coverage for breast tomosynthesis set forth in 3this paragraph.4    On and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall ensure 5that all networks of care for adult clients of the Department 6include access to at least one breast imaging Center of 7Imaging Excellence as certified by the American College of 8Radiology.9    On and after January 1, 2012, providers participating in a 10quality improvement program approved by the Department shall 11be reimbursed for screening and diagnostic mammography at the 12same rate as the Medicare program's rates, including the 13increased reimbursement for digital mammography and, after 14January 1, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1018), 15breast tomosynthesis.16    The Department shall convene an expert panel of not more 17than 15 members that includes including representatives of 18hospitals, free-standing mammography facilities, and doctors, 19including radiologists, to review establish quality standards 20for mammography. The panel shall be convened no later than 21January 1, 2027, meet quarterly thereafter, and act as an 22advisory body for developing quality standards for 23mammography. 24    On and after January 1, 2017, providers participating in a 25breast cancer treatment quality improvement program approved 26by the Department shall be reimbursed for breast cancer   HB5451- 13 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1treatment at a rate that is no lower than 95% of the Medicare 2program's rates for the data elements included in the breast 3cancer treatment quality program.4    The Department shall convene an expert panel, including 5representatives of hospitals, free-standing breast cancer 6treatment centers, breast cancer quality organizations, and 7doctors, including radiologists that are trained in all forms 8of FDA-approved breast imaging technologies, breast surgeons, 9reconstructive breast surgeons, oncologists, and primary care 10providers to establish quality standards for breast cancer 11treatment. This panel shall be in place by no later than 12January 1, 2027, and meet at least quarterly thereafter either 13in person or via remote teleconference. 14    Subject to federal approval, the Department shall 15establish a rate methodology for mammography at federally 16qualified health centers and other encounter-rate clinics. 17These clinics or centers may also collaborate with other 18hospital-based mammography facilities. By January 1, 2016, the 19Department shall report to the General Assembly on the status 20of the provision set forth in this paragraph.21    Subject to Department approval, the rate methodology for 22screening and diagnostic mammography shall be based on the 23quality standards established by the 2 expert panels convened 24by the Department and State qualified ACR Designated 25Comprehensive Breast Imaging Centers (formerly known as Breast 26Imaging Centers of Excellence). These centers or clinics may   HB5451- 14 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1also collaborate with other hospital-based mammography 2facilities. By April 1, 2027, the Department shall submit to 3the General Assembly a progress report on the implementation 4of this paragraph. 5    The Department shall establish a methodology to remind 6individuals who are age-appropriate for screening mammography, 7but who have not received a mammogram within the previous 18 8months, of the importance and benefit of screening 9mammography. The Department shall work with experts in breast 10cancer outreach and patient navigation to optimize these 11reminders and shall establish a methodology for evaluating 12their effectiveness and modifying the methodology based on the 13evaluation.14    The expert panels convened by the Department shall also 15establish a comprehensive and clinical methodology to inform 16women who are age-appropriate for screening mammography, but 17who have not received a mammogram within the previous 18 18months, of the importance and benefits of screening 19mammography. The Department shall work with an independent, 20nonprofit organization with a demonstrated history of 21coordinating and facilitating access to breast cancer 22screening and diagnostic services across multiple mammography 23facilities or units. The organization must not be a hospital 24or directly affiliated entity, and must not receive Medicaid 25reimbursement for breast cancer screening and diagnostic 26services across multiple mammography facilities or units. The   HB5451- 15 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1organization shall provide navigation, outreach, and support 2services specifically for uninsured or underinsured 3individuals in the designated area and maintain active 4collaborations with a network of community-based mammography 5providers. The organization shall optimize reminders on breast 6cancer outreach and patient navigation, and shall establish a 7methodology for evaluating their effectiveness and modifying 8the methodology based on the evaluation. 9    The Department shall establish a performance goal for 10primary care providers with respect to their female patients 11over age 40 receiving an annual mammogram. This performance 12goal shall be used to provide additional reimbursement in the 13form of a quality performance bonus to primary care providers 14who meet that goal.15    The Department shall devise a means of case-managing or 16patient navigation for beneficiaries diagnosed with breast 17cancer. This program shall initially operate as a pilot 18program in areas of the State with the highest incidence of 19mortality related to breast cancer. At least one pilot program 20site shall be in the metropolitan Chicago area and at least one 21site shall be outside the metropolitan Chicago area. On or 22after July 1, 2016, the pilot program shall be expanded to 23include one site in western Illinois, one site in southern 24Illinois, one site in central Illinois, and 4 sites within 25metropolitan Chicago. An evaluation of the pilot program shall 26be carried out measuring health outcomes and cost of care for   HB5451- 16 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1those served by the pilot program compared to similarly 2situated patients who are not served by the pilot program. 3    Upon the successful completion and evaluation of the pilot 4program, the Patient Assistance for Beneficiaries Diagnosed 5with Breast Cancer shall be established as a permanent 6initiative, effective within 2 years of the evaluation's 7completion. Beginning in the fiscal year immediately following 8the program's permanent establishment, the initiative shall, 9subject to appropriation, receive full funding to ensure that 10resources are allocated to support its operational and 11programmatic needs. The Department shall, on or before 12November 1 of that first fiscal year, and every November 1 13thereafter, submit a report to the General Assembly detailing 14program outcomes, financial expenditures, and any 15recommendations for adjustments to maintain or enhance the 16program's effectiveness. 17    The Department shall require all networks of care to 18develop a means either internally or by contract with experts 19in navigation and community outreach to navigate cancer 20patients to comprehensive care in a timely fashion. The 21Department shall require all networks of care to include 22access for patients diagnosed with cancer to at least one 23academic commission on cancer-accredited cancer program as an 24in-network covered benefit.25    The Department shall establish or facilitate training and 26continuing education opportunities specific to breast health   HB5451- 17 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1and mammography for radiologists, ensuring that these 2professionals are equipped with the latest knowledge and 3skills to accurately diagnose and assess breast cancer. 4Similar training and continuing education opportunities shall 5be provided for mammography technologists to ensure 6consistent, high-quality imaging practices that support early 7detection and accurate diagnosis. 8    The Department shall provide coverage and reimbursement 9for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine that is approved for 10marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration for all 11persons between the ages of 9 and 45. Subject to federal 12approval, the Department shall provide coverage and 13reimbursement for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine for 14persons of the age of 46 and above who have been diagnosed with 15cervical dysplasia with a high risk of recurrence or 16progression. The Department shall disallow any 17preauthorization requirements for the administration of the 18human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine. 19    On or after July 1, 2022, individuals who are otherwise 20eligible for medical assistance under this Article shall 21receive coverage for perinatal depression screenings for the 2212-month period beginning on the last day of their pregnancy. 23Medical assistance coverage under this paragraph shall be 24conditioned on the use of a screening instrument approved by 25the Department.26    The Department shall establish a grant program to assist   HB5451- 18 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1safety net facilities in acquiring or upgrading mammography 2equipment to support equitable access to state-of-the-art 3diagnostic tools. The grant program shall also, subject to 4appropriation, include funding for the hiring of qualified 5navigation staff, development of outreach initiatives tailored 6to high-risk populations, and ongoing program evaluation to 7ensure that navigation services effectively connect patients 8with needed care.9    Safety net facilities shall have access to free resources 10for enhancing their quality of care, including, but not 11limited to, staff training programs, financial support to 12subsidize or incorporate a comprehensive mammography database, 13and other essential quality-improvement initiatives. 14    Any medical or health care provider shall immediately 15recommend, to any pregnant individual who is being provided 16prenatal services and is suspected of having a substance use 17disorder as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act, 18referral to a local substance use disorder treatment program 19licensed by the Department of Human Services or to a licensed 20hospital which provides substance abuse treatment services. 21The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall assure 22coverage for the cost of treatment of the drug abuse or 23addiction for pregnant recipients in accordance with the 24Illinois Medicaid Program in conjunction with the Department 25of Human Services. 26    All medical providers providing medical assistance to   HB5451- 19 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1pregnant individuals under this Code shall receive information 2from the Department on the availability of services under any 3program providing case management services for addicted 4individuals, including information on appropriate referrals 5for other social services that may be needed by addicted 6individuals in addition to treatment for addiction. 7    The Illinois Department, in cooperation with the 8Departments of Human Services (as successor to the Department 9of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse) and Public Health, through 10a public awareness campaign, may provide information 11concerning treatment for alcoholism and drug abuse and 12addiction, prenatal health care, and other pertinent programs 13directed at reducing the number of drug-affected infants born 14to recipients of medical assistance. 15    Neither the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 16nor the Department of Human Services shall sanction the 17recipient solely on the basis of the recipient's substance 18abuse. 19    The Illinois Department shall establish such regulations 20governing the dispensing of health services under this Article 21as it shall deem appropriate. The Department should seek the 22advice of formal professional advisory committees appointed by 23the Director of the Illinois Department for the purpose of 24providing regular advice on policy and administrative matters, 25information dissemination and educational activities for 26medical and health care providers, and consistency in   HB5451- 20 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1procedures to the Illinois Department. 2    The Illinois Department may develop and contract with 3Partnerships of medical providers to arrange medical services 4for persons eligible under Section 5-2 of this Code. 5Implementation of this Section may be by demonstration 6projects in certain geographic areas. The Partnership shall be 7represented by a sponsor organization. The Department, by 8rule, shall develop qualifications for sponsors of 9Partnerships. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 10require that the sponsor organization be a medical 11organization. 12    The sponsor must negotiate formal written contracts with 13medical providers for physician services, inpatient and 14outpatient hospital care, home health services, treatment for 15alcoholism and substance abuse, and other services determined 16necessary by the Illinois Department by rule for delivery by 17Partnerships. Physician services must include prenatal and 18obstetrical care. The Illinois Department shall reimburse 19medical services delivered by Partnership providers to clients 20in target areas according to provisions of this Article and 21the Illinois Health Finance Reform Act, except that: 22        (1) Physicians participating in a Partnership and 23    providing certain services, which shall be determined by 24    the Illinois Department, to persons in areas covered by 25    the Partnership may receive an additional surcharge for 26    such services.   HB5451- 21 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1        (2) The Department may elect to consider and negotiate 2    financial incentives to encourage the development of 3    Partnerships and the efficient delivery of medical care. 4        (3) Persons receiving medical services through 5    Partnerships may receive medical and case management 6    services above the level usually offered through the 7    medical assistance program. 8    Medical providers shall be required to meet certain 9qualifications to participate in Partnerships to ensure the 10delivery of high quality medical services. These 11qualifications shall be determined by rule of the Illinois 12Department and may be higher than qualifications for 13participation in the medical assistance program. Partnership 14sponsors may prescribe reasonable additional qualifications 15for participation by medical providers, only with the prior 16written approval of the Illinois Department. 17    Nothing in this Section shall limit the free choice of 18practitioners, hospitals, and other providers of medical 19services by clients. In order to ensure patient freedom of 20choice, the Illinois Department shall immediately promulgate 21all rules and take all other necessary actions so that 22provided services may be accessed from therapeutically 23certified optometrists to the full extent of the Illinois 24Optometric Practice Act of 1987 without discriminating between 25service providers. 26    The Department shall apply for a waiver from the United   HB5451- 22 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1States Health Care Financing Administration to allow for the 2implementation of Partnerships under this Section. 3    The Illinois Department shall require health care 4providers to maintain records that document the medical care 5and services provided to recipients of Medical Assistance 6under this Article. Such records must be retained for a period 7of not less than 6 years from the date of service or as 8provided by applicable State law, whichever period is longer, 9except that if an audit is initiated within the required 10retention period then the records must be retained until the 11audit is completed and every exception is resolved. The 12Illinois Department shall require health care providers to 13make available, when authorized by the patient, in writing, 14the medical records in a timely fashion to other health care 15providers who are treating or serving persons eligible for 16Medical Assistance under this Article. All dispensers of 17medical services shall be required to maintain and retain 18business and professional records sufficient to fully and 19accurately document the nature, scope, details and receipt of 20the health care provided to persons eligible for medical 21assistance under this Code, in accordance with regulations 22promulgated by the Illinois Department. The rules and 23regulations shall require that proof of the receipt of 24prescription drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and 25eyeglasses by eligible persons under this Section accompany 26each claim for reimbursement submitted by the dispenser of   HB5451- 23 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1such medical services. No such claims for reimbursement shall 2be approved for payment by the Illinois Department without 3such proof of receipt, unless the Illinois Department shall 4have put into effect and shall be operating a system of 5post-payment audit and review which shall, on a sampling 6basis, be deemed adequate by the Illinois Department to assure 7that such drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and eyeglasses 8for which payment is being made are actually being received by 9eligible recipients. Within 90 days after September 16, 1984 10(the effective date of Public Act 83-1439), the Illinois 11Department shall establish a current list of acquisition costs 12for all prosthetic devices and any other items recognized as 13medical equipment and supplies reimbursable under this Article 14and shall update such list on a quarterly basis, except that 15the acquisition costs of all prescription drugs shall be 16updated no less frequently than every 30 days as required by 17Section 5-5.12. 18    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 19Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after July 22, 2013 20(the effective date of Public Act 98-104), establish 21procedures to permit skilled care facilities licensed under 22the Nursing Home Care Act to submit monthly billing claims for 23reimbursement purposes. Following development of these 24procedures, the Department shall, by July 1, 2016, test the 25viability of the new system and implement any necessary 26operational or structural changes to its information   HB5451- 24 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1technology platforms in order to allow for the direct 2acceptance and payment of nursing home claims. 3    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 4Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after August 15, 52014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-963), establish 6procedures to permit ID/DD facilities licensed under the ID/DD 7Community Care Act and MC/DD facilities licensed under the 8MC/DD Act to submit monthly billing claims for reimbursement 9purposes. Following development of these procedures, the 10Department shall have an additional 365 days to test the 11viability of the new system and to ensure that any necessary 12operational or structural changes to its information 13technology platforms are implemented. 14    The Illinois Department shall require all dispensers of 15medical services, other than an individual practitioner or 16group of practitioners, desiring to participate in the Medical 17Assistance program established under this Article to disclose 18all financial, beneficial, ownership, equity, surety or other 19interests in any and all firms, corporations, partnerships, 20associations, business enterprises, joint ventures, agencies, 21institutions or other legal entities providing any form of 22health care services in this State under this Article. 23    The Illinois Department may require that all dispensers of 24medical services desiring to participate in the medical 25assistance program established under this Article disclose, 26under such terms and conditions as the Illinois Department may   HB5451- 25 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1by rule establish, all inquiries from clients and attorneys 2regarding medical bills paid by the Illinois Department, which 3inquiries could indicate potential existence of claims or 4liens for the Illinois Department. 5    Enrollment of a vendor shall be subject to a provisional 6period and shall be conditional for one year. During the 7period of conditional enrollment, the Department may terminate 8the vendor's eligibility to participate in, or may disenroll 9the vendor from, the medical assistance program without cause. 10Unless otherwise specified, such termination of eligibility or 11disenrollment is not subject to the Department's hearing 12process. However, a disenrolled vendor may reapply without 13penalty. 14    The Department has the discretion to limit the conditional 15enrollment period for vendors based upon the category of risk 16of the vendor.17    Prior to enrollment and during the conditional enrollment 18period in the medical assistance program, all vendors shall be 19subject to enhanced oversight, screening, and review based on 20the risk of fraud, waste, and abuse that is posed by the 21category of risk of the vendor. The Illinois Department shall 22establish the procedures for oversight, screening, and review, 23which may include, but need not be limited to: criminal and 24financial background checks; fingerprinting; license, 25certification, and authorization verifications; unscheduled or 26unannounced site visits; database checks; prepayment audit   HB5451- 26 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1reviews; audits; payment caps; payment suspensions; and other 2screening as required by federal or State law.3    The Department shall define or specify the following: (i) 4by provider notice, the "category of risk of the vendor" for 5each type of vendor, which shall take into account the level of 6screening applicable to a particular category of vendor under 7federal law and regulations; (ii) by rule or provider notice, 8the maximum length of the conditional enrollment period for 9each category of risk of the vendor; and (iii) by rule, the 10hearing rights, if any, afforded to a vendor in each category 11of risk of the vendor that is terminated or disenrolled during 12the conditional enrollment period. 13    To be eligible for payment consideration, a vendor's 14payment claim or bill, either as an initial claim or as a 15resubmitted claim following prior rejection, must be received 16by the Illinois Department, or its fiscal intermediary, no 17later than 180 days after the latest date on the claim on which 18medical goods or services were provided, with the following 19exceptions:20        (1) In the case of a provider whose enrollment is in 21    process by the Illinois Department, the 180-day period 22    shall not begin until the date on the written notice from 23    the Illinois Department that the provider enrollment is 24    complete.25        (2) In the case of errors attributable to the Illinois 26    Department or any of its claims processing intermediaries   HB5451- 27 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1    which result in an inability to receive, process, or 2    adjudicate a claim, the 180-day period shall not begin 3    until the provider has been notified of the error.4        (3) In the case of a provider for whom the Illinois 5    Department initiates the monthly billing process.6        (4) In the case of a provider operated by a unit of 7    local government with a population exceeding 3,000,000 8    when local government funds finance federal participation 9    for claims payments. 10    For claims for services rendered during a period for which 11a recipient received retroactive eligibility, claims must be 12filed within 180 days after the Department determines the 13applicant is eligible. For claims for which the Illinois 14Department is not the primary payer, claims must be submitted 15to the Illinois Department within 180 days after the final 16adjudication by the primary payer.17    In the case of long term care facilities, within 120 18calendar days of receipt by the facility of required 19prescreening information, new admissions with associated 20admission documents shall be submitted through the Medical 21Electronic Data Interchange (MEDI) or the Recipient 22Eligibility Verification (REV) System or shall be submitted 23directly to the Department of Human Services using required 24admission forms. Effective September 1, 2014, admission 25documents, including all prescreening information, must be 26submitted through MEDI or REV. Confirmation numbers assigned   HB5451- 28 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1to an accepted transaction shall be retained by a facility to 2verify timely submittal. Once an admission transaction has 3been completed, all resubmitted claims following prior 4rejection are subject to receipt no later than 180 days after 5the admission transaction has been completed.6    Claims that are not submitted and received in compliance 7with the foregoing requirements shall not be eligible for 8payment under the medical assistance program, and the State 9shall have no liability for payment of those claims.10    To the extent consistent with applicable information and 11privacy, security, and disclosure laws, State and federal 12agencies and departments shall provide the Illinois Department 13access to confidential and other information and data 14necessary to perform eligibility and payment verifications and 15other Illinois Department functions. This includes, but is not 16limited to: information pertaining to licensure; 17certification; earnings; immigration status; citizenship; wage 18reporting; unearned and earned income; pension income; 19employment; supplemental security income; social security 20numbers; National Provider Identifier (NPI) numbers; the 21National Practitioner Data Bank (NPDB); program and agency 22exclusions; taxpayer identification numbers; tax delinquency; 23corporate information; and death records.24    The Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with 25State agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter 26into agreements with federal agencies and departments, under   HB5451- 29 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1which such agencies and departments shall share data necessary 2for medical assistance program integrity functions and 3oversight. The Illinois Department shall develop, in 4cooperation with other State departments and agencies, and in 5compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 6appropriate and effective methods to share such data. At a 7minimum, and to the extent necessary to provide data sharing, 8the Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with State 9agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter into 10agreements with federal agencies and departments, including, 11but not limited to: the Secretary of State; the Department of 12Revenue; the Department of Public Health; the Department of 13Human Services; and the Department of Financial and 14Professional Regulation.15    Beginning in fiscal year 2013, the Illinois Department 16shall set forth a request for information to identify the 17benefits of a pre-payment, post-adjudication, and post-edit 18claims system with the goals of streamlining claims processing 19and provider reimbursement, reducing the number of pending or 20rejected claims, and helping to ensure a more transparent 21adjudication process through the utilization of: (i) provider 22data verification and provider screening technology; and (ii) 23clinical code editing; and (iii) pre-pay, pre-adjudicated, or 24post-adjudicated predictive modeling with an integrated case 25management system with link analysis. Such a request for 26information shall not be considered as a request for proposal   HB5451- 30 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1or as an obligation on the part of the Illinois Department to 2take any action or acquire any products or services. 3    The Illinois Department shall establish policies, 4procedures, standards and criteria by rule for the 5acquisition, repair and replacement of orthotic and prosthetic 6devices and durable medical equipment. Such rules shall 7provide, but not be limited to, the following services: (1) 8immediate repair or replacement of such devices by recipients; 9and (2) rental, lease, purchase or lease-purchase of durable 10medical equipment in a cost-effective manner, taking into 11consideration the recipient's medical prognosis, the extent of 12the recipient's needs, and the requirements and costs for 13maintaining such equipment. Subject to prior approval, such 14rules shall enable a recipient to temporarily acquire and use 15alternative or substitute devices or equipment pending repairs 16or replacements of any device or equipment previously 17authorized for such recipient by the Department. 18Notwithstanding any provision of Section 5-5f to the contrary, 19the Department may, by rule, exempt certain replacement 20wheelchair parts from prior approval and, for wheelchairs, 21wheelchair parts, wheelchair accessories, and related seating 22and positioning items, determine the wholesale price by 23methods other than actual acquisition costs.24    The Department shall require, by rule, all providers of 25durable medical equipment to be accredited by an accreditation 26organization approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and   HB5451- 31 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1Medicaid Services and recognized by the Department in order to 2bill the Department for providing durable medical equipment to 3recipients. No later than 15 months after the effective date 4of the rule adopted pursuant to this paragraph, all providers 5must meet the accreditation requirement.6    In order to promote environmental responsibility, meet the 7needs of recipients and enrollees, and achieve significant 8cost savings, the Department, or a managed care organization 9under contract with the Department, may provide recipients or 10managed care enrollees who have a prescription or Certificate 11of Medical Necessity access to refurbished durable medical 12equipment under this Section (excluding prosthetic and 13orthotic devices as defined in the Orthotics, Prosthetics, and 14Pedorthics Practice Act and complex rehabilitation technology 15products and associated services) through the State's 16assistive technology program's reutilization program, using 17staff with the Assistive Technology Professional (ATP) 18Certification if the refurbished durable medical equipment: 19(i) is available; (ii) is less expensive, including shipping 20costs, than new durable medical equipment of the same type; 21(iii) is able to withstand at least 3 years of use; (iv) is 22cleaned, disinfected, sterilized, and safe in accordance with 23federal Food and Drug Administration regulations and guidance 24governing the reprocessing of medical devices in health care 25settings; and (v) equally meets the needs of the recipient or 26enrollee. The reutilization program shall confirm that the   HB5451- 32 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1recipient or enrollee is not already in receipt of the same or 2similar equipment from another service provider, and that the 3refurbished durable medical equipment equally meets the needs 4of the recipient or enrollee. Nothing in this paragraph shall 5be construed to limit recipient or enrollee choice to obtain 6new durable medical equipment or place any additional prior 7authorization conditions on enrollees of managed care 8organizations. 9    The Department shall execute, relative to the nursing home 10prescreening project, written inter-agency agreements with the 11Department of Human Services and the Department on Aging, to 12effect the following: (i) intake procedures and common 13eligibility criteria for those persons who are receiving 14non-institutional services; and (ii) the establishment and 15development of non-institutional services in areas of the 16State where they are not currently available or are 17undeveloped; and (iii) notwithstanding any other provision of 18law, subject to federal approval, on and after July 1, 2012, an 19increase in the determination of need (DON) scores from 29 to 2037 for applicants for institutional and home and 21community-based long term care; if and only if federal 22approval is not granted, the Department may, in conjunction 23with other affected agencies, implement utilization controls 24or changes in benefit packages to effectuate a similar savings 25amount for this population; and (iv) no later than July 1, 262013, minimum level of care eligibility criteria for   HB5451- 33 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1institutional and home and community-based long term care; and 2(v) no later than October 1, 2013, establish procedures to 3permit long term care providers access to eligibility scores 4for individuals with an admission date who are seeking or 5receiving services from the long term care provider. In order 6to select the minimum level of care eligibility criteria, the 7Governor shall establish a workgroup that includes affected 8agency representatives and stakeholders representing the 9institutional and home and community-based long term care 10interests. This Section shall not restrict the Department from 11implementing lower level of care eligibility criteria for 12community-based services in circumstances where federal 13approval has been granted. 14    The Illinois Department shall develop and operate, in 15cooperation with other State Departments and agencies and in 16compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 17appropriate and effective systems of health care evaluation 18and programs for monitoring of utilization of health care 19services and facilities, as it affects persons eligible for 20medical assistance under this Code. 21    The Illinois Department shall report annually to the 22General Assembly, no later than the second Friday in April of 231979 and each year thereafter, in regard to: 24        (a) actual statistics and trends in utilization of 25    medical services by public aid recipients; 26        (b) actual statistics and trends in the provision of   HB5451- 34 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1    the various medical services by medical vendors; 2        (c) current rate structures and proposed changes in 3    those rate structures for the various medical vendors; and 4        (d) efforts at utilization review and control by the 5    Illinois Department. 6    The period covered by each report shall be the 3 years 7ending on the June 30 prior to the report. The report shall 8include suggested legislation for consideration by the General 9Assembly. The requirement for reporting to the General 10Assembly shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as 11required by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization 12Act, and filing such additional copies with the State 13Government Report Distribution Center for the General Assembly 14as is required under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State 15Library Act. 16    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 17any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 18with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 19Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 20Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 21whatever reason, is unauthorized. 22    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 23rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 24any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 25of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 26with Section 5-5e.   HB5451- 35 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1    Because kidney transplantation can be an appropriate, 2cost-effective alternative to renal dialysis when medically 3necessary and notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1-11 4of this Code, beginning October 1, 2014, the Department shall 5cover kidney transplantation for noncitizens with end-stage 6renal disease who are not eligible for comprehensive medical 7benefits, who meet the residency requirements of Section 5-3 8of this Code, and who would otherwise meet the financial 9requirements of the appropriate class of eligible persons 10under Section 5-2 of this Code. To qualify for coverage of 11kidney transplantation, such person must be receiving 12emergency renal dialysis services covered by the Department. 13Providers under this Section shall be prior approved and 14certified by the Department to perform kidney transplantation 15and the services under this Section shall be limited to 16services associated with kidney transplantation. 17    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to the 18contrary, on or after July 1, 2015, all FDA-approved forms of 19medication assisted treatment prescribed for the treatment of 20alcohol dependence or treatment of opioid dependence shall be 21covered under both fee-for-service and managed care medical 22assistance programs for persons who are otherwise eligible for 23medical assistance under this Article and shall not be subject 24to any (1) utilization control, other than those established 25under the American Society of Addiction Medicine patient 26placement criteria, (2) prior authorization mandate, (3)   HB5451- 36 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1lifetime restriction limit mandate, or (4) limitations on 2dosage. 3    On or after July 1, 2015, opioid antagonists prescribed 4for the treatment of an opioid overdose, including the 5medication product, administration devices, and any pharmacy 6fees or hospital fees related to the dispensing, distribution, 7and administration of the opioid antagonist, shall be covered 8under the medical assistance program for persons who are 9otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 10As used in this Section, "opioid antagonist" means a drug that 11binds to opioid receptors and blocks or inhibits the effect of 12opioids acting on those receptors, including, but not limited 13to, naloxone hydrochloride or any other similarly acting drug 14approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. The 15Department shall not impose a copayment on the coverage 16provided for naloxone hydrochloride under the medical 17assistance program.18    Upon federal approval, the Department shall provide 19coverage and reimbursement for all drugs that are approved for 20marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration and that 21are recommended by the federal Public Health Service or the 22United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention for 23pre-exposure prophylaxis and related pre-exposure prophylaxis 24services, including, but not limited to, HIV and sexually 25transmitted infection screening, treatment for sexually 26transmitted infections, medical monitoring, assorted labs, and   HB5451- 37 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1counseling to reduce the likelihood of HIV infection among 2individuals who are not infected with HIV but who are at high 3risk of HIV infection.4    A federally qualified health center, as defined in Section 51905(l)(2)(B) of the federal Social Security Act, shall be 6reimbursed by the Department in accordance with the federally 7qualified health center's encounter rate for services provided 8to medical assistance recipients that are performed by a 9dental hygienist, as defined under the Illinois Dental 10Practice Act, working under the general supervision of a 11dentist and employed by a federally qualified health center. 12    Within 90 days after October 8, 2021 (the effective date 13of Public Act 102-665), the Department shall seek federal 14approval of a State Plan amendment to expand coverage for 15family planning services that includes presumptive eligibility 16to individuals whose income is at or below 208% of the federal 17poverty level. Coverage under this Section shall be effective 18beginning no later than December 1, 2022.19    Subject to approval by the federal Centers for Medicare 20and Medicaid Services of a Title XIX State Plan amendment 21electing the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly 22(PACE) as a State Medicaid option, as provided for by Subtitle 23I (commencing with Section 4801) of Title IV of the Balanced 24Budget Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-33) and Part 460 25(commencing with Section 460.2) of Subchapter E of Title 42 of 26the Code of Federal Regulations, PACE program services shall   HB5451- 38 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1become a covered benefit of the medical assistance program, 2subject to criteria established in accordance with all 3applicable laws.4    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 5community-based pediatric palliative care from a trained 6interdisciplinary team shall be covered under the medical 7assistance program as provided in Section 15 of the Pediatric 8Palliative Care Act.9    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, within 1012 months after June 2, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 11102-1037) and subject to federal approval, acupuncture 12services performed by an acupuncturist licensed under the 13Acupuncture Practice Act who is acting within the scope of his 14or her license shall be covered under the medical assistance 15program. The Department shall apply for any federal waiver or 16State Plan amendment, if required, to implement this 17paragraph. The Department may adopt any rules, including 18standards and criteria, necessary to implement this paragraph. 19    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 20medical assistance program shall, subject to federal approval, 21reimburse hospitals for costs associated with a newborn 22screening test for the presence of metachromatic 23leukodystrophy, as required under the Newborn Metabolic 24Screening Act, at a rate not less than the fee charged by the 25Department of Public Health. Notwithstanding any other 26provision of this Code, the medical assistance program shall,   HB5451- 39 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1subject to appropriation and federal approval, also reimburse 2hospitals for costs associated with all newborn screening 3tests added on and after August 9, 2024 (the effective date of 4Public Act 103-909) to the Newborn Metabolic Screening Act and 5required to be performed under that Act at a rate not less than 6the fee charged by the Department of Public Health. The 7Department shall seek federal approval before the 8implementation of the newborn screening test fees by the 9Department of Public Health. 10    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 11beginning on January 1, 2024, subject to federal approval, 12cognitive assessment and care planning services provided to a 13person who experiences signs or symptoms of cognitive 14impairment, as defined by the Diagnostic and Statistical 15Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition, shall be covered 16under the medical assistance program for persons who are 17otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 18    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 19medically necessary reconstructive services that are intended 20to restore physical appearance shall be covered under the 21medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 22eligible for medical assistance under this Article. As used in 23this paragraph, "reconstructive services" means treatments 24performed on structures of the body damaged by trauma to 25restore physical appearance. 26    Subject to federal approval, for dates of services on and   HB5451- 40 -LRB104 18569 KTG 32012 b1after January 1, 2026, over-the-counter choline dietary 2supplements for pregnant persons shall be covered under the 3medical assistance program. 4(Source: P.A. 103-102, Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 1-1-24; 5103-102, Article 95, Section 95-15, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 61-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-368, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, 7Article 5, Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, Article 90, 8Section 90-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-808, eff. 91-1-26; 103-909, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1040, eff. 8-9-24; 104-9, 10eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.